Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2024, chapter 120, article 2, section 12, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Authority" means the Brooklyn Park new text begin City Council, serving as the Brooklyn Park new text end Economic Development Authority. (c) "Biotech innovation district" means a geographic area in the city identified in the development plan. (d) "City" means the city of Brooklyn Park. (e) "Development plan" means the plan adopted under subdivision 2. (f) "Project" means a project to implement the development plan. (g) "Public infrastructure project" means a project financed at least partially with public money to: (1) acquire or remediate real property, including site improvement; (2) demolish, repair, or rehabilitate buildings; (3) install, construct, or reconstruct public infrastructure necessary for the biotech innovation district; (4) acquire, construct, reconstruct, develop, or equip parking facilities and other transit-related facilities; and (5) acquire, install, construct, reconstruct, develop, or equip recreational, social, cultural, or tourism facilities. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end